Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.080

Uniform sales price of shares required—Application to specify arrangements on sale of shares not sold in subscription offering.

The sales price of the shares of capital stock to be sold in the conversion shall be a uniform price determined in accordance with RCW 32.32.290, 32.32.305, and 32.32.325. The applicant shall specify in its conversion application the underwriting and/or other marketing arrangements to be made to assure the sale of all shares not sold in the subscription offering.

[ 1981 c 85 s 15.]